Louisiana, session 2026, HB525.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:827.2.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§827.2.1. Collection of certain correctional census data
A. The legislature finds that the Department of Public Safety and Corrections
collects and maintains correctional census, demographic, admissions, release,
supervision, mortality, and operational data. The legislature further finds that this
data is used to generate publicly available reports and informational dashboards on
the website of the department. The legislature finds that public access to this data
in machine-readable form promotes transparency, accountability, and informed
policymaking. The legislature previously adopted Senate Concurrent Resolution No.
32 of the 2024 Regular Session, which urged and requested the Department of Public
Safety and Corrections to publish certain correctional census data in downloadable
format. The legislature now finds that codification of these transparency
requirements is necessary to ensure uniform, consistent, and timely public access to
correctional system data.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1333 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 525
B.(1) No later than thirty days after the end of each calendar month, the
department shall publish on its publicly accessible website the downloadable,
machine-readable version of the offender census at state correctional facilities.
(2) The report required pursuant to this Subsection shall include all of the
following:
(a) Availability in Microsoft Excel format.
(b) Comparable data elements across both parish and state facility reports as
applicable.
(c) A breakdown of individuals, as applicable, who are housed on behalf of
other agencies that include but are not limited to any of the following:
(i) United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement.
(ii) United States Marshals Service.
(iii) Individuals sentenced to parish prisons or jails.
(iv) Pre-trial detainees.
C.(1) The department shall publish on its website, in Microsoft Excel format,
all underlying datasets used to generate each informational dashboard that include
but are not limited to any of the following:
(a) Interactive demographic dashboards that include all of the following:
(i) Demographics information on the prison population.
(ii) Demographic trend information on the prison population.
(iii) Demographic information on the population that is under supervision.
(b) Interactive admission and release dashboards that include all of the
following:
(i) Demographic information on admissions by calendar year.
(ii) Demographic information on releases by calendar year.
(c) An interactive death dashboard that includes demographic information
on deaths that occurred in the prison population.
(2) The department shall update the datasets on an annual basis.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1333 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 525
(3) Each dataset shall include all variables used to generate the
corresponding dashboard.
D. A current codebook shall accompany each published dataset with all of
the following information:
(1) Definitions of each variable.
(2) Data type specifications.
(3) Coding values and descriptions.
(4) Methodology used to compile or calculate the dataset.
(5) Known limitations or exclusions.
E. The department shall publish and maintain on its website a publicly
accessible index of correctional datasets maintained by the department. The index
shall include all of the following:
(1) The name of each dataset.
(2) A general description.
(3) The date range available.
(4) The frequency of update.
(5) Whether the dataset is available for download.
(6) Contact information for public records requests.
F. Nothing in this Section shall require the disclosure of personally
identifiable information that is protected under state or federal law. The department
may redact identifying information as necessary to comply with applicable
confidentiality provisions, provided that aggregate and anonymized data shall be
published to the maximum extent permitted by law.
G. The department shall submit a written report that certifies compliance
with this Section to the House Committee on Administration of Criminal Justice and
the Senate Committee on Judiciary B no later than March 31, 2027.
H. The department shall implement the provisions of this Section no later
than October 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1333 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 525